Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Disturbances of Public Order

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision prohibiting the importation of armed force to suppress violence, with certain exceptions thereto, see art. 19, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to general powers of cities and towns to regulate, prevent or suppress riots and disturbances, see §

15-1-103

.

For provision prohibiting bodies of men other than national guard troops or troops of the United States from parading with arms without license of the governor, see §

19-8-104

.

As to authority of the governor to order the national guard to repeal or suppress riots, invasions or insurrection, see §

19-9-206

.

As to authority of the governor to order the state militia to aid in preserving order and public safety in time of emergency, see §

19-9-207

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Prosecutions of inmates of state or local penal institutions for crime of riot, 39 ALR4th 1170.

§ 6-6-101.
Fighting in public; penalties.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if, by agreement, he fights with one (1) or more persons in public.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Probable cause to arrest for breach of the peace. —

Where the officers knew of a phone call reporting a fight between a bartender and defendant who was identified by name, upon arrival defendant was standing by the bar having a heated verbal exchange with the bartender, there was broken glass on the floor, and defendant refused to comply with a request to speak with the officers outside and physically resisted removal, there was probable cause to arrest for breach of the peace under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-6-102(a), and an officer was acting in the lawful performance of his duties when defendant kneed him in the groin, supporting defendant's conviction of felony interference with a peace officer in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b). Mascarenas v. State, 2003 WY 124, 76 P.3d 1258,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence to establish criminal participation by individual involved in gang fight or assault, 24 ALR4th 243.

What constitutes sufficiently violent, tumultuous, forceful, aggressive or terrorizing conduct to establish crime of riot in state courts, 38 ALR4th 648.

§ 6-6-102.
Breach of the peace; penalties.

A person commits breach of the peace if he disturbs the peace of a community or its inhabitants by unreasonably loud noise or music or by using threatening, abusive or obscene language or violent actions with knowledge or probable cause to believe he will disturb the peace.

Breach of the peace is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1996, ch. 63, § 1.

Cross references. —

For general powers of cities and towns to regulate, prevent or suppress noises, disturbances or disorderly assemblies, see §

15-1-103

.

Probable cause. —

Where the officers knew of a phone call reporting a fight between a bartender and defendant who was identified by name, upon arrival defendant was standing by the bar having a heated verbal exchange with the bartender, there was broken glass on the floor, and defendant refused to comply with a request to speak with the officers outside and physically resisted removal there was probable cause to arrest for breach of the peace under this section, and an officer was acting in the lawful performance of his duties when defendant kneed him in the groin, supporting defendant's conviction of felony interference with a peace officer in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b). Mascarenas v. State, 2003 WY 124, 76 P.3d 1258,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2003).

Federal gun permit denied based on conviction for breach ofpeace. —

The department of criminal investigation (DCI) did not err when it denied a concealed gun permit under 18 U.S.C.S. § 922(g) to an applicant who had been convicted of breach of the peace involving an altercation with his spouse; the “violent action” language in the Wyoming breach of peace statute is included in the federal statute which prohibits those convicted of “domestic violence” from possessing firearms. King v. Wyo. Div. of Crim. Investigation, 2004 WY 52, 89 P.3d 341,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2004).

Applied

in

Meldrum v. State, 23 Wyo. 12, 146 P. 596,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1915).

Quoted

in

Salisbury Livestock Co. v. Colorado Cent. Credit Union, 793 P.2d 470,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Snyder v. Hausheer, 268 F. 776,

1920 U.S. App. LEXIS 2365

(8th Cir. 1920); Jessen v. State, 622 P.2d 1374,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Misuse of telephone as breach of peace, 97 ALR2d 503.

Participation of student in demonstration on or near campus as warranting imposition of criminal liability, 32 ALR3d 551.

Insulting words addressed directly to police officer as breach of peace or disorderly conduct, 14 ALR4th 1252.

Civil liability for insulting or abusive language — modern status, 20 ALR4th 773.

What constitutes sufficiently violent, tumultuous, forceful, aggressive or terrorizing conduct to establish crime of riot in state courts, 38 ALR4th 648.

Validity, construction, and effect of “hate crimes” statutes, “ethnic intimidation” statutes, or the like, 22 ALR5th 261.

Validity, construction, and operation of Federal disorderly conduct regulation (36 C.F.R. § 2.34), 180 ALR Fed 637.

§ 6-6-103.
Telephone calls; unlawful acts; penalties; communicating a threat of bodily injury or death; place of commission of crime.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if he telephones another anonymously or under a false or fictitious name and uses obscene, lewd or profane language or suggests a lewd or lascivious act with intent to terrify, intimidate, threaten, harass, annoy or offend.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if:

By repeated anonymous telephone calls, he disturbs the peace, quiet or privacy of persons where the calls were received; or

He telephones or otherwise electronically or in writing communicates with a person and threatens to:

Inflict death to the person, to the person’s immediate family or to anyone at the school in which the person is a student or employee; or

Inflict injury or physical harm to the person, to the person’s immediate family or to property of the person.

A crime under this section is committed at the place where the calls or other electronic or written communications either originated or were received.

For purposes of this section, “immediate family” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child or other person living in the person’s household.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2013 ch. 136, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

,
rewrote the introductory language in (b)(ii), added “or other electronic or written communications” in (c), and added (b)(ii)(A), (B) and (d).

Laws 2013, ch. 136, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

Constitutionality. —

This section is not unconstitutionally void for vagueness, or unconstitutionally overbroad. Brock v. State, 981 P.2d 465,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1999).

Section not lesser included crime of terrorist threats. —

This section (threatening telephone calls) is not a lesser included crime of §

6-2-505

(terrorist threats). For example, if the state proves that a person threatened a violent felony in reckless disregard of the risk of causing an evacuation, they have proved the elements of §

6-2-505

but not the elements of this section, because there is no proof that the threat was telephoned. Therefore, the elements of this section are not identical to, nor a subset of, the elements of § 6-2-505, and this section is not a lesser included crime. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Sentence was within authority granted by section. —

Where the defendant pled guilty to seven distinct offenses and was given a term of incarceration within the legislatively authorized limit for each offense, and the district court chose to impose consecutive terms, as was in its discretion, the sentence was not beyond the authority granted in this section. Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Coleman v. State, 741 P.2d 99,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1987); Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Forum state's jurisdiction over nonresident defendant in action based on obscene or threatening telephone call from out of state, 37 ALR4th 852.

Telephone calls as nuisance, 53 ALR4th 1153.

§ 6-6-104.
Unlawful automated telephone solicitation; exceptions; penalties.

No person shall use an automated telephone system or device for the selection and dialing of telephone numbers and playing of recorded messages if a message is completed to the dialed number, for purposes of:

Offering any goods or services for sale;

Conveying information on goods or services in soliciting sales or purchases;

Soliciting information;

Gathering data and statistics; or

Promoting or any other use related to a political campaign.

This section shall not prohibit the use of an automated telephone system or device described under subsection (a) of this section for purposes of informing purchasers of the receipt, availability or delivery of goods or services, any delay or other pertinent information on the status of any purchased goods or services or responding to an inquiry initiated by any person, or the use of an automated telephone dialing system as authorized by W.S.

40-12-303

.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 224, § 1; 2001, ch. 163, § 2.

Cited

in

Blakeman v. State, 2004 WY 139, 100 P.3d 1229,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statute or law pertaining to telephone solicitation, 44 ALR5th 619.

Validity, construction and application of Telephone Consumer Protection Act (47 USCS § 227), 132 ALR Fed 625.

§ 6-6-105.
Unlawful protesting at a funeral; penalties.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he protests, pickets, or otherwise causes a breach of the peace within nine hundred (900) feet of a cemetery, church, building or other facility at which a funeral or memorial service is being conducted, and if the protest, picket or other action occurs within one (1) hour prior to, during or within one (1) hour after the funeral or memorial service and the protest, picket, or breach of the peace is directed at the funeral or memorial service.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 53, § 1; 2011, ch. 80, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “nine hundred (900)” for “three hundred (300),” and added “and the protest, picket, or breach of the peace is directed at the funeral or memorial service” at the end.

Effective dates

Laws 2007, ch. 53, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.